California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) Notwithstanding any contractual provision to the contrary, the invention developer and the customer shall each have the right to cancel a contract for invention development services for any reason at any time within seven days of the date the invention developer and the customer sign the contract. Cancellation shall be effected by written notice mailed or delivered to the invention developer or the customer. If said notice is mailed, it must be postmarked by midnight of the last day of the cancellation period. If the notice is delivered, it must be delivered by the end of the invention developer’s normal business day. Within five business days after
 receipt of such notice of cancellation by the customer, the invention developer shall return to the customer, by mail, all moneys paid and all materials provided by the customer.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply to every contract executed between an invention developer and a customer. Each such contract shall contain the following statement in 10-point boldface type immediately above the place at which the customer signs the contract:

“The seven-day period during which you may cancel this contract for any reason by mailing or delivering written notice to the invention developer will expire on .(Last date to mail or deliver
 notice)If you choose to mail your notice, it must be placed in the United States mail properly addressed first-class postage prepaid and postmarked before midnight of this date. If you choose to deliver your notice to the invention developer directly, it must be delivered to him by the end of his normal business day on this date. The invention developer also has the right to cancel this contract by notice similarly mailed or delivered.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22374.

Each and every contract for invention development services shall carry a distinctive and conspicuous cover sheet with the following notice (and no other) imprinted thereon in boldface type of not less than 10-point size:

“The following disclosures are required by law:

“You have the right to cancel this contract for any reason at any time within seven days from the date you and the invention developer sign the contract and you receive a fully executed copy of it. To exercise this option you need only mail or deliver to this invention developer written notice of your
 cancellation. The method and time for notification is set forth in this contract immediately above the place for your signature. Upon cancellation, the invention developer must return by mail, within five business days, all money paid and all materials provided by you.

“Your potential patent rights may be adversely affected by any attempt to commercialize your idea or invention before a patent application covering it is filed. Nonconfidential disclosures of your idea or invention may also trigger certain statutory deadlines for filing a patent application in the United States and would prevent you from obtaining valid patent rights in countries whose law provides that patent applications must be filed before there is a public disclosure.

“This contract between you and the invention developer is regulated by law. The invention developer is not qualified or permitted to advise you whether protection of your idea or invention
 is available under the patent, copyright or trademark laws of the United States or any other law. This contract does not provide any patent, copyright or trademark protection for your idea or invention. If your idea or invention is patentable, copyrightable or subject to trademark protection, or infringes an existing valid patent, copyright or trademark or a patent, copyright or trademark for which application has been made, your failure to inquire into these matters may affect your rights to your idea or invention.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22375.

No invention developer shall acquire any interest, partial or whole, in the title to the customer’s invention, unless the invention developer contracts to manufacture the invention and acquires such interest for such purpose at or about the time the contract for manufacture is executed. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an invention developer from contracting with a customer to receive a portion of any proceeds accruing to the customer as a result of performance of invention development services by the invention developer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22376.

No contract for invention development services shall require or entail the execution of any note or series of notes by the customer which, when separately negotiated, will cut off as to third parties any right of action or defense which the customer may have against the invention developer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22377.

Any assignee of the invention developer’s rights is subject to all equities and defenses of the customer against the invention developer existing in favor of the customer at the time of the assignment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22378.

With respect to each and every contract for invention development services, the invention developer shall deliver to the customer, at the address specified in the contract at quarterly intervals throughout the term of the contract, a written statement of the services performed to date; provided, however, the first such statement need not be delivered until 180 days after the contract is executed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Mandatory Contract Terms [22379. - 22379.]

22379.

Every contract for invention development services shall set forth in at least 10-point boldface type, or equivalent size if handwritten, all of the following:

(a) The terms and conditions of payment required by Section 22373.

(b) A full and detailed description of the acts or services that the invention developer undertakes to perform for the customer. To the extent that the description of acts or services affords the invention developer discretion to decide what acts or services are to be performed by the invention developer, the invention developer shall exercise that discretion to promote the best interests of the customer.

(c) A statement whether the invention developer undertakes to construct one or more prototypes, models, or devices embodying the customer’s invention.

(d) A statement whether the invention developer undertakes to sell or distribute one or more prototypes, models, or devices embodying the customer’s invention.

(e) The name of the person or firm contracting to perform the invention development services, the name under which said person or firm is doing or has done business as an invention developer, and the name of any parent, subsidiary or affiliated company that may engage in performing the invention development services.

(f) The invention developer’s principal business address and the name and address of its agent in the State of California authorized to receive service of process.

(g) The business form of the invention developer, whether corporate, partnership, or otherwise.

(h) A statement of the fee charged, a statement that a portion of the fee charged will be paid as a commmission or other similar payment, if in fact it is intended to be so paid, to a person inducing, directly or indirectly, a customer to contract for the services of the invention developer, which statement shall specify the names of the person or persons receiving said payment; and a statement of the approximate portion of the fee charged, if any, that will be expended for services relating to patent matters.

(i) A statement that the invention developer does not intend to expend more for the invention development services than the fee charged the customer, if, in fact, it does not, and if it does, a statement of the estimated expenditures of the invention developer in excess of the fee received from the customer.

(j) If any oral or written representation of estimated or projected customer earnings is made, a statement of such estimation or projection and the data upon which it is based.

(k) A single statement setting forth both (1) the total number of customers who have contracted with the invention developer provided, however, that the number need not reflect those customers who have contracted within the last 30 days, and (2) the number of customers that have received, by virtue of the invention developer’s performance of invention development services, an amount of money in excess of the amount of money paid by such customers to the invention developer. 

(l) A statement that the invention developer is required to maintain all records and correspondence relating to performance of the invention development services for that customer for a period not less than three years after expiration of the term of the contract for invention development services.

(m) The name and address of the custodian of all records and correspondence relating to the performance of the invention development services.

(n) A statement that the records and correspondence required to be maintained by subdivision (m) above will be made available to the customer or his representative for review and copying at the customer’s expense on the invention developer’s premises during normal business hours upon seven days’ written notice, said time period to begin from the date the notice is placed in the United States mail properly addressed first-class postage prepaid.

(o) A statement of the expected date of completion of the invention development services.

(p) A statement as follows:

“Your potential patent rights may be adversely affected by any attempt to commercialize your idea or invention before a patent application covering it is filed. Nonconfidential disclosures of your idea or invention may also trigger certain statutory deadlines for filing a patent application in the United States and would prevent you from obtaining valid patent rights in countries whose law provides that patent applications must be filed before there is a public disclosure.

“This contract between you and the invention developer is regulated by law. The invention developer is not qualified or permitted to advise you whether protection of your idea or invention is available under the patent, copyright or trademark laws of the United States or any other law. This contract does not provide any patent, copyright or trademark protection for your idea or invention. If your idea or invention is patentable, copyrightable or subject to trademark protection, or infringes an existing valid patent, copyright or trademark or a patent, copyright or trademark for which application has been made, your failure to inquire into these matters may affect your rights to your idea or invention.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 332, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disclosures Made Prior to Contract [22380. - 22381.]

22380.

Every invention developer who charges a fee or requires any consideration for his invention development services must clearly and conspicuously disclose such fact in every advertisement of such services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22381.

In the first oral communication with a customer or in the first written response to an inquiry by a customer other than an oral communication or written response, the primary purpose of which is to arrange an appointment with the invention developer for presentation of his or her invention development services, the invention developer shall cause the following written disclosures to be made and given to each customer at the time of the disclosure:

(a) A statement of the fee charged, if known, or a statement of the approximate range of fees charged; a statement that a portion of the fee charged will be paid as a commission or other similar payment, if in fact it is intended to be so paid, to a person inducing, directly or indirectly, a customer to contract for the services of the invention developer; and a statement of the approximate portion of the fee charged, if any, that will be expended for services relating to patent matters.

(b) A statement that the invention developer does not intend to expend more for the invention development services than the fee charged the customer, if, in fact, it does not, and if it does, a statement of the estimated expenditures of the invention developer in excess of the fee received from the customer.

(c) A single statement setting forth both (1) the total number of customers who have contracted with the invention developer; however, the number need not reflect those customers who have contracted within the last 30 days; and (2) the number of customers that have received by virtue of the invention developer’s performance of invention development services an amount of money in excess of the amount of money paid by those customers to the invention developer.

(d) A statement as follows:

“Your potential patent rights may be adversely affected by any attempt to commercialize your idea or invention before a patent application covering it is filed. Nonconfidential disclosures of your idea or invention may also trigger certain statutory deadlines for filing a patent application in the United States and would prevent you from obtaining valid patent rights in countries whose law provides that patent applications must be filed before there is a public disclosure. Any contract for invention development services between you and our firm will be regulated by law. Our firm is not qualified or permitted to advise you whether protection of your idea or invention is available under the patent, copyright or trademark laws of the United States or any other law. The contract does not provide any patent, copyright or trademark protection for your idea or invention. If your idea or invention is patentable, copyrightable or subject to trademark protection, or infringes an existing valid patent, copyright or trademark or a patent, copyright or trademark for which application has been made, your failure to inquire into these matters may affect your rights to your idea or invention.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 332, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Remedies and Enforcement [22382. - 22388.]

22382.

The provisions of this chapter are not exclusive and do not relieve the parties or the contract subject thereto from compliance with all other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22383.

Any contract for invention development services which does not comply with the applicable provisions of this chapter shall be void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy, provided that no contract shall be void and unenforceable if the invention developer proves that noncompliance was unintentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the use of reasonable procedures adopted to avoid any such errors and makes an appropriate correction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22384.

Any contract for invention development services entered into in reliance upon any willful and false, fraudulent, or misleading representation by the invention developer shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22385.

Any waiver by the customer of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22386.

Any person who has been injured by a violation of this chapter by an invention developer, or by any false or fraudulent statement, representation, or omission of material fact by an invention developer, or by failure of an invention developer to make all the disclosures required by Section 22379, may bring a civil action against the invention developer for the greater of the following amounts:

(1) Three thousand dollars ($3,000).

(2) Three times the amount of the actual damages, if any, sustained by the
 plaintiff.
In addition to the greater of the preceding amounts, the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22387.

Any invention developer who willfully violates any provision of this chapter, or willfully enters an invention development contract which omits any duty or disclosure required by this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any superior court of this state shall have jurisdiction in equity to restrain and enjoin the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter relating to invention development services and contracts therefor.

The duty to institute actions for violation of such provisions of this chapter, including equity proceedings to restrain and enjoin such violations, is hereby vested
 in the Attorney General, district attorneys, county counsels, and city attorneys. The Attorney General, any district attorney, or city attorney may prosecute misdemeanor actions or institute equity proceedings or both.

This section shall not be deemed to prohibit the enforcement by any person of any right provided by this or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22388.

Failure to make the disclosure required by Article 4 (commencing with Section 22380) shall render any contract subsequently entered into between the customer and the invention developer voidable by the customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Financial Requirements [22389. - 22391.1.]

22389.

Every invention developer rendering or offering to render invention development services in this state shall maintain a bond issued by a surety company admitted to do business in this state. The principal sum of the bond shall be 5 percent of the invention developer’s gross income from the invention development business in this state during the invention developer’s last fiscal year, except that the principal sum of the bond shall not be less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in the first or any subsequent year of operations. A copy of such bond shall be filed with the Secretary of State prior to the time the invention developer first commences business in this state.
 The invention developer shall have 90 days after the end of each fiscal year within which to change the bond as may be necessary to conform to the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22390.

The bond required by Section 22389 shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of any person who, after entering into a contract for invention development services with an invention developer is damaged by fraud or dishonesty or failure to provide the services of the invention developer in performance of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

22391.

(a) When a deposit has been made in lieu of a bond pursuant to Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the person asserting a claim against the deposit shall, in lieu of Section 996.430 of the Code of Civil Procedure, establish the claim by furnishing evidence to the Secretary of State of a money judgment entered by a court together with evidence that the claimant is a person described in Section 22390.

(b) When a person has established the claim with the Secretary of
 State, the Secretary of State shall review and approve the claim and enter the date of approval thereon. The claim shall be designated an “approved claim.”

(c) When the first claim against a particular deposit account has been approved, it shall not be paid until the expiration of a period of 240 days after the date of its approval by the Secretary of State. Subsequent claims that are approved by the Secretary of State within the same 240-day period shall similarly not be paid until the expiration of the 240-day period. Upon the expiration of the 240-day period, the Secretary of State shall pay all approved claims from that 240-day period in full unless the deposit is insufficient, in which case each approved claim shall be paid a pro rata share of the deposit.

(d) When the Secretary of State approves the first claim against a particular deposit account after the expiration of a
 240-day period, the date of approval of that claim shall begin a new 240-day period to which subdivision (c) shall apply with respect to the amount remaining in the deposit account.

(e) After a deposit account is exhausted, no further claims shall be paid by the Secretary of State. Claimants who have had their claims paid in full or in part pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) shall not be required to return funds received from the deposit for the benefit of other claimants.

(f) When a deposit has been made in lieu of a bond, the amount of the deposit shall not be subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution with respect to an action or judgment against the invention developer, other than as to an amount no longer needed or required for the purpose of this chapter which would otherwise be returned to the invention developer by the Secretary of State.

(g) The Secretary of State shall retain a cash deposit for two years from the date the Secretary of State receives written notification from the assignor of the deposit that the assignor has ceased to engage in the business of an invention developer or has filed a bond pursuant to Section 22389, provided that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. The written notice shall include all of the following: (1) name, address, and telephone number of the assignor; (2) name, address, and telephone number of the bank at which the deposit is located; (3) account number of the deposit; and (4) a statement whether the assignor is ceasing to engage in the business of an invention developer or has filed a bond with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall forward an acknowledgment of receipt of the written notification to the assignor at the address indicated therein, specifying the date of receipt of the written notice and anticipated
 date of release of the deposit.

(h) This section shall apply to all deposits retained by the Secretary of State.

(i) A judge of a superior court may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of two years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit or order the Secretary of State to retain the deposit for a sufficient period beyond the two years specified in subdivision (g) to resolve outstanding claims against the deposit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22391.1.

(a) The Secretary of State shall enforce the provisions of this title that govern the filing and maintenance of bonds and deposits in lieu of bonds.

(b) The Secretary of State shall charge and collect a filing fee not to exceed the cost of filing the bond or the deposit in lieu of a bond pursuant to Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous Provisions [22392. - 22395.]

22392.

Every invention developer shall maintain all records and correspondence relating to performance of each invention development service contract for a period of not less than three years after expiration of the term of each such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22393.

No invention developer shall make, or authorize the making of, any reference to compliance by it with this act in any advertisement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 967.)
-------------------------------------------

22394.

If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held unconstitutional, the remainder of the chapter and the application of such provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

22395.

An invention developer shall maintain as confidential all disclosures made to it by a customer seeking invention development services, except:

(a) Information which at the time of disclosure is in the public domain.

(b) Information which, after disclosure, becomes part of the public domain by publication or otherwise, independently of any act or omission by the invention developer.

(c) Information which the invention developer can establish by competent proof was in its possession at the time of disclosure by the customer, and was not acquired, directly or indirectly, from the customer.

(d) Information which the invention developer receives from a third party; provided, however, that such information was not obtained in confidence by said third party, directly or indirectly, from the customer.

This duty of confidentiality includes the taking of reasonable steps by the invention developer to prevent disclosure of confidential information to third parties. This confidential relationship cannot be waived by a customer without an express written waiver by the customer of the invention developer’s obligation of confidentiality, and no waiver shall be entered into until after the disclosures described in Section 22381 have been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 332, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 17.5. Appliance Labeling [22410. - 22411.2.]

22410.

The following terms, as used in this chapter, have the meaning expressed in this section:

(a) “Appliance” means any new television, radio, audio or video recorder, or playback device normally used or sold for use in the home or in a private motor vehicle, or any new refrigerator, freezer, range, oven, washer, dryer, dishwasher, room air conditioner, or sewing machine normally used or sold for use in the home, or any new typewriter, adding machine, calculator, or other similar machine, or any electrically operated tool, any of which appliances have a manufacturer’s invoice sale value of fifty dollars ($50) or
 more.

(b) “Manufacturer” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship which is involved in the manufacture, assembly, or production of an appliance or whose brand name appears on any appliance. The term “manufacturer” also means any agent, representative or distributor of a manufacturer who sells, transfers, or exchanges an appliance to or with a retailer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

22411.

No manufacturer shall sell any appliance in this state unless such appliance has been permanently marked with a serial number unique to that appliance. A marking that is required to be permanent shall be molded, die-stamped, or paint-stenciled or stamped or etched on metal that is permanently secured or indelibly stamped on pressure sensitive labels secured by adhesive that is adequate and suitable for permanent application.

Every manufacturer of an appliance to be sold within this state shall provide on the first page of the warranty or instruction manual, or on a separate card, a description of the appliance providing a space
 thereon for recording the model number and serial number, the description of the location of such numbers on the appliance, and instructions to the final purchaser of the appliance to record and retain such numbers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

22411.2.

The provisions of Section 22411 shall not apply to factory or dealer installed radios installed in a new motor vehicle or to radios installed in a motor vehicle by a dealer to replace such factory or dealer installed radios.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 18. Identification Cards [22430. - 22430.]

22430.

(a) No deceptive identification document shall be manufactured, sold, offered for sale, furnished, offered to be furnished, transported, offered to be transported, or imported or offered to be imported into this state unless there is diagonally across the face of the document, in not less than 14-point type and printed conspicuously on the document in permanent ink, the following statement: 

NOT A GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT

and, also printed conspicuously on the document, the name of the manufacturer.

(b) As used in this section, “deceptive identification document” means any document
 not issued by a governmental agency of this state, another state, or the federal government, which purports to be, or which might deceive an ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is, a document issued by such an agency, including, but not limited to, a driver’s license, identification card, birth certificate, passport, or social security card.

(c) Any person who violates or proposes to violate this section may be enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction. Actions for injunction under this section may be prosecuted by the Attorney General or any district attorney in this state in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint or upon the complaint of any person.

(d) Any person who violates the provisions of subdivision (a) who knows or reasonably should know that the deceptive identification document will be used for fraudulent purposes
 is guilty of a crime, and upon conviction therefor, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 29.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 18.5. Simulated Checks [22433. - 22433.]

22433.

(a) As used in this section, “simulated check” means any document that is not currency or a check, draft, note, bond, or other negotiable instrument but that, because of its appearance, has the tendency to mislead or deceive any person viewing it into believing that it, in fact, represents any of the following: (1) currency or a negotiable instrument that can be deposited in a bank or used for third party payments; (2) a prize, gift, or monetary benefit that the recipient has won or is entitled or guaranteed to receive; or (3) an actual check or other item of value that can be claimed or redeemed. “Simulated check” does not include a nonnegotiable check, draft, note, or other instrument that is used for soliciting orders for the purchase of checks, drafts, notes, bonds, or other instruments, and that is clearly marked as a sample, specimen, or nonnegotiable. “Simulated check” also does not include any document indicating in a truthful and nonmisleading manner that a person, in fact, unconditionally has won or is entitled or guaranteed to receive a specific prize, gift, or amount of money or credit.

(b) No person shall produce, advertise, offer for sale, sell, distribute, or otherwise transfer for use in this state any simulated check.

(c) The Attorney General may bring an action to enjoin a violation of this section, and to recover a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation of this section. A violation of this section may be enjoined without proof that any person has, in fact, been injured or damaged by the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 19. Shopping and Laundry Carts [22435. - 22435.13.]



  ARTICLE 1. Identification of Shopping and Laundry Carts [22435. - 22435.8.]

22435.

As used in this article:

(a) “Shopping cart” means a basket which is mounted on wheels or a similar device generally used in a retail establishment by a customer for the purpose of transporting goods of any kind.

(b) “Laundry cart” means a basket which is mounted on wheels and used in a coin-operated laundry or drycleaning retail establishment by a customer or an attendant for the purpose of transporting fabrics and the supplies necessary to process them.

(c) “Parking area” means a parking lot or other property provided by a retailer for use by a customer for parking an automobile or other vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.1.

The provisions of Section 22435.2 shall apply when a shopping cart or a laundry cart has a sign permanently affixed to it that identifies the owner of the cart or the retailer, or both; notifies the public of the procedure to be utilized for authorized removal of the cart from the premises; notifies the public that the unauthorized removal of the cart from the premises or parking area of the retail establishment, or the unauthorized possession of the cart, is a violation of state law; and lists a valid telephone number or address for returning the cart removed from the premises or parking area to the owner or retailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 291, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.2.

It is unlawful to do any of the following acts, if a shopping cart or laundry cart has a permanently affixed sign as provided in Section 22435.1:

(a) To remove a shopping cart or laundry cart from the premises or parking area of a retail establishment with the intent to temporarily or permanently deprive the owner or retailer of possession of the cart.

(b) To be in possession of any shopping cart or laundry cart that has been removed from the premises or the parking area of a retail establishment, with the intent to temporarily or permanently deprive the owner or retailer of possession of the cart.

(c) To be in possession of any shopping cart or laundry cart with serial numbers removed, obliterated, or altered, with the intent to temporarily or permanently deprive the owner or retailer of possession of the cart.

(d) To leave or abandon a shopping cart or laundry cart at a location other than the premises or parking area of the retail establishment with the intent to temporarily or permanently deprive the owner or retailer of possession of the cart.

(e) To alter, convert, or tamper with a shopping cart or laundry cart, or to remove any part or portion thereof or to remove, obliterate or alter serial numbers on a cart, with the intent to temporarily or permanently deprive the owner or retailer of possession of the cart.

(f) To be in possession of any shopping cart or laundry cart while that cart is not located on the premises or parking lot of a retail establishment, with the intent to temporarily or permanently deprive the owner or retailer of possession of the cart.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.3.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The provisions of this section are not intended to preclude the application of any other laws relating to prosecution for theft.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.4.

This article shall not apply to the owner of a shopping cart or laundry cart or to a retailer, or to their agents or employees, or to a customer of a retail establishment who has written consent from the owner of a shopping cart or laundry cart or a retailer to be in possession of the shopping cart or laundry cart or to remove the shopping cart or laundry cart from the premises or the parking area of the retail establishment, or to do any of the acts specified in Section 22435.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.5.

(a) In any civil proceeding, any shopping cart or laundry cart which has a sign affixed to it pursuant to Section 22435.1 shall establish a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence that the property is that of the person or business named in the sign and not abandoned by the person or business named in the sign.

(b) In any criminal proceeding, it may be inferred that any shopping cart or laundry cart which has a sign affixed to it pursuant to Section 22435.1 is the property of the person or business named in the sign and has not been abandoned by the person or business named in the sign.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 436, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

22435.7.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds that the retrieval by local governmental agencies of shopping carts specified in this section is in need of uniform statewide regulation and constitutes a matter of statewide concern that shall be governed solely by this section and Section 22435.7.5.

(b) (1) A city, county,
 or city and county may do either of the following with a shopping cart that has a sign affixed to it in accordance with Section 22435.1 that is located outside the premises or parking area of a retail establishment:

(A) Pursuant to an ordinance adopted by a city, county, or city and county in accordance with Section 22435.7.5, retrieve and return the shopping cart to the parking area or premises of the owner or retailer identified on the sign.

(B) Except as provided in subdivision (i), if the shopping cart is not retrieved within three business days from the date the owner of the shopping cart, or their
 agent, receives actual notice from the city, county, or city and county of the shopping cart’s discovery and location, impound the shopping cart.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the parking area of a retail establishment located in a multistore complex or shopping center shall include the entire parking area used by the complex or center.

(c) In instances where the location of a shopping cart will impede emergency services, a city, county, or city and county is authorized to immediately impound the shopping cart from public or private property.

(d) Any city, county, or city and county that impounds a shopping cart under the
 authority provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) is authorized to recover its actual costs for providing this service.

(e) Any shopping cart that is impounded by a city, county, or city and county pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be held at a location that is both:

(1) Reasonably convenient to the owner of the shopping cart.

(2) Open for business at least six hours of each business day.

(f) (1) A city, county, or city and county may fine the owner of a shopping cart in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each occurrence in excess of three during a specified six-month period for failure to retrieve shopping carts in accordance with
 subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or subdivision (c).
